Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.590

Cooperation, joint agreements or orders with other states and United States to achieve uniformity.

The director and his or her designee are hereby authorized to confer with and cooperate with the legally constituted authorities of other states and of the United States, for the purpose of obtaining uniformity in the administration of federal and state marketing regulations, licenses, agreements, or orders, and the director is authorized to conduct joint hearings, issue joint or concurrent marketing agreements or orders, for the purposes and within the standards set forth in this chapter, and may exercise any administrative authority prescribed by this chapter to effect such uniformity of administration and regulation.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6092; 1961 c 256 s 59.]